Nebraska, session 109, LB60.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 9-829, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
9-829 A lottery game retailer shall sell tickets only on the premises
stated in the contract. No ticket shall be sold over a telephone or through the
mail. No credit shall be extended by the lottery game retailer for the purchase
of a ticket. No lottery tickets shall be sold through a vending or dispensing
device.
Sec. 2. Original section 9-829, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
repealed.
-1-